Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201953-502
Nebraska Craft Brewery Board; meetings; members; terms; expenses; removal; procedure.

(1) Within thirty days after the appointment of the initial members of the Nebraska Craft Brewery Board, such board shall conduct its first regular meeting. During that meeting, the board members shall elect from among themselves, by majority vote, a chairperson, vice-chairperson, secretary, and treasurer, all to serve for terms of one year from the date of election. Subsequent board meetings shall take place at least once every six months and at such times as called by the chairperson or by any three board members.

(2) Each member shall serve for a term of three years, except that at the expiration of the terms of the members in 2022, the Governor shall appoint two members for a term of one year, two members for a term of two years, and three members for a term of three years, and their successors shall be appointed for a term of three years. Upon completion of a term, a member may, at the Governor's discretion, be reappointed.

(3) All voting members of the board shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred while engaged in the performance of official responsibilities as members of such board pursuant to sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

(4) A member may be removed by the Governor for cause. The member shall first be given a written copy of the charges against him or her and also an opportunity to be heard publicly. If a member moves out of Nebraska, that shall be deemed sufficient cause for removal from office.

Laws 2016, LB1105, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB624, § 1.
September 1, 2019